src/twol-sma.txt
"1st rule for even syllabic verbs Sg3 ïe-ea IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns | #: ] _ e: Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
	where Vx in (ï o)
	      Vy in (e u)
	matched ;

"2nd rule for even syllabic verbs Sg3 ïe-ea IV, and for general a Umlaut"
 e:a <=>        [ï:|o:] _ Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3sUML: ;
   [ #: | Cns+ ] i:     _ Cns+ [
                                   [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] | %^aLATUS: %»: ] |
                                   [ ([%>:|%»:])                %^1UML:0    ] |
                                   [ (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML:  ]
                                ] ; ! Even syllabic verbs present sg, 
                                    ! diphth ie-ea part 2
   [ #: | Cns+ ] [å|a|u] _ Cns+ [
                                   [ Vow %»: [ Cns -[s|l] ] | %^aLATUS: %»: ] |
                                   [ ([%>:|%»:]) %^1UML:0 ]|
                                   [ (     %»: ) i: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ]
                                ] ; ! Even verbs pres sg, and nouns, 
                                    ! diphth ae-aa, åe-åa, ue-ua
   [#: | #: Cns+]([å|a]) _ Cns+ %»: %^htjidhUML: e h t j ;
   (%»:)         i:      _ Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;


! Verbs like: tjïeledh, roehtedh

!€# tjïel%>%^3sUMLa
!€0 tjeal00a

!€# roeht%>%^3sUMLa
!€0 ruaht00a


"Even syllabic verbs Du1Pl3 IV"
 Vx:Vy <=> [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ] [å|a] _     Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3dUML: ;
           [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ]       _ (e) Cns+ [ %>: | %»: ] %^3dUML: ;           
	where Vx in (ï a o)
	      Vy in (i e u)
	matched ;
	
!€# mïnn%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 minn00ien

!€# bark%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 berk00ien

!€# jovk%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 juvk00ien


!€# tjïek%>%^3dUMLien
!€0 tjiek00ien




! prob delete this after testing
! " verbs Sg3 + PrfPtc ÅÅ II"
!  a:å <=> _ a:å Cns+ o:0 e: %^2UML: ;




! Umlaut rules for even-syll past tense


"ie:ee and ae:ee past tense"
Vx:e <=> _ e Cns* [ %>: | %»: ] %^iUML: ;
	where Vx in ( a i );

!€# jieht%>%^iUMLim
!€0 jeeht00im

!€# tjael%>%^iUMLim
!€0 tjeel00im


"åe:öö and ue:öö past tense I"
Vx:ö <=> _ e: Cns* [ %>: | %»: ] %^iUML: ;
	where Vx in ( u å o ) ;

"åe:öö and ue:öö past tense II"
e:ö <=> [ å: | u: | o: ] _ Cns* [ %>: | %»: ] %^iUML: ;

!€# bået%>%^iUMLim
!€0 bööt00im

!€# vuejn%>%^iUMLim
!€0 vööjn00im


"a-Latus as e in 3-syllable words"
%^aLATUS:e <=> _ ( %»: ) :Cns+ ( %>: ) (:Vow+) ( %>: )  %^DISIMP:  [ :Cns*                   |
                                                                     :Cns* :Vow              |
                                                                     :Cns* :Vow+ g u j m i e
                                                                   ] #: ;

! maana -> maanetje
!€# maan%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP#
!€0 maane0tje00

!$# maan%^aLATUS%»tje%^DISIMP#
!$0 maana0tje00

! maanatjasse
!€# maan%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!€0 maana0tj0asse

!$# maan%^aLATUS%»tj%>asse
!$0 maane0tj0asse

! Umlaut rules for even-syll short passive
! All Umlaut rows R1-R6 gets umlauted to R5 in short passives

"Short passive Umlaut Column 1"
Vx:y <=> _ Cns+ %»:  %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (i ï æ) ;

! bissedh -> byssedh
!€# biss%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 byss00edh

! sïrredh -> syrredh
!€# sïrr%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 syrr00edh

!$# sïrr%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 sïrr00edh


! gæljodh > gyljedh
!€# gælj%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 gylj00edh

!$# gælj%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 gælj00edh


"Short passive Umlaut Column 2"
Vx:o <=> [ Cns (%»: %^adteUML:) | #: ] _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (a e) ;

! bestedh -> bostedh
!€# best%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 bost00edh

!$# best%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 best00edh

! darjodh -> dorjedh
!€# darj%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 dorj00edh

!$# darj%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 darj00edh


"Short passive Umlaut Column 3"
Vx:o <=> _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (u å) ;

! juhtedh -> johtedh
!€# juht%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 joht00edh

!$# juht%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 juht00edh

! gåhpodh -> gohpedh
!€# gåhp%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 gohp00edh

!$# gåhp%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 gåhp00edh

! govledh -> govledh
!€# govl%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 govl00edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 4 - part 1"
Vx:y <=> _ [ a: | e: ] Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (e i ï) ;
         !

"Short passive Umlaut Column 4 - part 2"
Vx:ö <=> [ e: | i: | ï: ] _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (a e) ;

!«sosialïsme MIMO»  ï -> i 
!LE 
! ^MI

! viedtedh -> vyödtedh
!€# viedt%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 vyödt00edh

!$# viedt%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 viedt00edh

! tjearodh -> tjyöredh
!€# tjear%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 tjyör00edh

!$# tjear%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 tjear00edh

! bïepmedh - byöpmedh
!€# bïepm%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 byöpm00edh

!$# bïepm%»%^PASSUMLedh
!$0 bïepm00edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 5 - part 1"
a:å  <=>                        _ [ a: | e: ] Cns+  %»:                 %^PASSUML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ] [a|å] _             Cns+ (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;
         [ #: | #: Cns+ ]       _   a         Cns+ (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;

! daejredh -> dååjredh
!€# daejr%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 dååjr00edh

! gaatodh - gååtedh
!€# gaat%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 gååt00edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 5, 6, 7 part 2" ! No rule needed for column 6 part 1
Vx:å <=> [ a: | u: | o: | å: ] _ Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (a e) ;

! åadtjodh - åådtjedh
!€# gaat%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 gååt00edh

! åestedh -> ååstedh
!€# åest%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 ååst00edh

"Short passive Umlaut Column 7 - part 1"
Vx:å <=> _ [ a: | e: ] Cns+ %»: %^PASSUML: ;
         where Vx in (   u o) ;
!         where Vx in (a u o) ; ! Removed a, since it conflicts with the rule
                                ! "Short passive Umlaut Column 5 - part 1" above

! vuejnedh - vååjnedh
!€# vuejn%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 vååjn00edh

! guarkedh -> gåårkedh
!€# guark%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 gåårk00edh

! våajodh -> vååjedh
!€# våaj%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 vååj00edh

! voessjedh - vååssjedh
!€# voessj%»%^PASSUMLedh
!€0 vååssj00edh


"Der/htjidh Umlaut i(e):ï(e) and u(e):o(e)"
Vx:Vy <=> [ #: | #: Cns+ ] _ (e) Cns+ %»: %^htjidhUML: e h t j ;
 	where Vx in (i u)
 	      Vy in (ï o)
 	matched ;

!bueledh->boelehtjidh
!€# buel%»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!€0 boel00ehtjidh

!$# buel%»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!$0 buel00ehtjidh


!paekedh->paakehtjidh
!€# paek%»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!€0 paak00ehtjidh

!$# paek%»%^htjidhUMLehtjidh
!$0 paek00ehtjidh





"Der/didh Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words Column 4 ea:ïe and Column 7 ua:oe part 1"
Vx:Vy <=> _ a: Cns+ %»: %^didhUML: e [d|l] ;
 	where Vx in (e u)
 	      Vy in (ï o)
 	matched ;


! veajedh - vïejedidh
!€# veaj%»%^didhUMLedidh
!€0 vïej00edidh

!$# veaj%»%^didhUMLedidh
!$0 veaj00edidh

! guarkedh - goerkedidh
!€# guark%»%^didhUMLedidh
!€0 goerk00edidh

!$# guark%»%^didhUMLedidh
!$0 guark00edidh

"Der/didh Umlaut for GUARKEDH-words Column 1 æ:ï and Column 3 å:o"
Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns+ %»: %^didhUML: e [d|l] ;
   where Vx in (æ å)
         Vy in (ï o)
   matched ;

! skælkedh - skïlkedidh
!€# skælk%»%^didhUMLedidh
!€0 skïlk00edidh

!$# skælk%»%^didhUMLedidh
!$0 skælk00edidh

!!!plåtjkedh - plotjkedidh
!€# plåtjk%»%^didhUMLedidh
!€0 plotjk00edidh

!$# plåtjk%»%^didhUMLedidh
!$0 plåtjk00edidh



"Der/adte Umlaut for oe-verbs Column 1 æ:y, Column 2 a:o and Column 3 å:o"
Vx:Vy <=> [ #: | #: Cns+ ] _ Cns+ (%»:) o: e: Cns+ %»: %^adteUML: ;
 	where Vx in (æ a å)
 	      Vy in (y o o)
 	matched ;


!båetedh - båetiestidh - båatastalledh
!€# bået%»iest%»%^adteUMLalledh
!€0 båat00ast00alledh

!$# bået%»iest%»%^adteUMLalledh
!$0 bået00ast00alledh

!$# bået%»iest%»%^adteUMLalledh
!$0 båat0iest00alledh


!tjearodh - tjearoelidh - tjyöreladtedh
!€# tjear%»oel%»%^adteUMLadtedh
!€0 tjyör00el00adtedh

!$# tjear%»oel%»%^adteUMLadtedh
!$0 tjear00el00adtedh

!$# tjear%»oel%»%^adteUMLadtedh
!$0 tjyör0oel00adtedh




! Lexical test suites - infinitives
! =================================

!€0 dåeriedi%>dh
!€0 dåeriedi0dh

!€# bisse%>dh
!€0 bisse0dh

!€# belte%>dh
!€0 belte0dh

!€# buhtje%>dh
!€0 buhtje0dh

!€# paeke%>dh
!€0 paeke0dh

!€# båete%>dh
!€0 båete0dh

!€# buele%>dh
!€0 buele0dh

!€# æbjo%>dh
!€0 æbjo0dh

!€# hajko%>dh
!€0 hajko0dh

!€# gåhpo%>dh
!€0 gåhpo0dh

!€# tjearo%>dh
!€0 tjearo0dh

!€# baajsko%>dh
!€0 baajsko0dh

!€# gåaro%>dh
!€0 gåaro0dh

!€# skælke%>dh
!€0 skælke0dh

!€# skajke%>dh
!€0 skajke0dh

!€# plåtjke%>dh
!€0 plåtjke0dh

!€# sleapke%>dh
!€0 sleapke0dh

!€# snjåarke%>dh
!€0 snjåarke0dh

!€# sïrre%>dh
!€0 sïrre0dh

!€# sarje%>dh
!€0 sarje0dh

!€# sodte%>dh
!€0 sodte0dh

!€# skïerke%>dh
!€0 skïerke0dh

!€# slaapke%>dh
!€0 slaapke0dh

!€# snjåare%>dh
!€0 snjåare0dh

!€# tjoehpe%>dh
!€0 tjoehpe0dh

!€# skylle%>dh
!€0 skylle0dh

!€# aalhteroste%>dh
!€0 aalhteroste0dh

!€# skyöre%>dh
!€0 skyöre0dh

!€# vååjne%>dh
!€0 vååjne0dh

!€# skilhte%>dh
!€0 skilhte0dh

!€# sijle%>dh
!€0 sijle0dh

!€# snjurme%>dh
!€0 snjurme0dh

!€# snjeere%>dh
!€0 snjeere0dh

!€# gööle%>dh
!€0 gööle0dh

!"No word boundary as hyphen in the beginning of a string"
!#:% /<= .#. _ ;

!"Force word boundary as hyphen between matching vowels"
! #:%- <=> :Vx _ :Vx ;        ! This should apply to only the surface side
! 	where Vx in (e a) matched ;

!€# laajhna#aaltoe
!€0 laajhna-aaltoe

!€# aerpie#eeke
!€0 aerpie-eeke

!$# laajhna#aaltoe
!$0 laajhna0aaltoe

!$# aerpie#eeke
!$0 aerpie0eeke

!KEEPIF(HYPHENATE)
!"Make hyphenation points visible"
!%#:%- => [:Letter - :Vx] _ [:Letter - :Vx] [:Letter - :Vx] ;
!    where Vx in (e a) matched ;
    

"Make hyphenation points visible when between identical vowels"
%#:%- <=> :Vx _ :Vx :Vx ; ! This should apply to only the surface side
 	where Vx in (e a) matched ; !nonsub
!ELSE

!ENDKEEP


 
!---Duommá-Majja twol-practice, låt stå!
!%#:%- <=> :Letter _ :Letter ;! Don leat hui ceahppi, Toamma!  
!%#:%- <=> :Vz _ :Vy ;  
!    where Vz in (Letter) ;
!    where Vy in (Letter) ; 
!%#:%- <=> :Vy _ :Vz ;  
!    where Vz in (Letter) ;
!    where Vy in (Letter) ; 
!%#:%- <=>  :Vx _ :Vx :Vx ; ! This should apply to only the surface side
!	where Vx in (e a) matched ; 
 	
 	! matched = alltid er samme bokstav, f.eks jåvle-eejehtalleme blir det bindestrek, mens i aevjie#aesie blir det ikke bindestrek. 

!€# Aevjie^aesie
!€0 Aevjie0aesie

!€# Aevjie^aesiede
!€0 Aevjie-eesi0de
